California statutes. Public Resources Code
Any person, firm, corporation, or association who digs, drills, excavates, constructs, or owns, or controls a well from which natural gas flows shall, upon the abandonment of the well, cap or otherwise close the mouth of or entrance to the well in such a manner as to prevent the unnecessary or wasteful escape of natural gas into the atmosphere.

No person, firm, corporation, or association who owns or controls land in which such a well is situated shall wilfully permit natural gas flowing from the well wastefully or unnecessarily to escape into the atmosphere.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who wilfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

Each day during which natural gas is wilfully allowed wastefully or unnecessarily to escape into the atmosphere is a separate and distinct violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Spacing of Wells and Community Leases [3600. - 3609.]

3600.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any well hereafter drilled for oil or gas, or hereafter drilled and permitted to produce oil or gas, which is located within 100 feet of an outer boundary of the parcel of land on which the well is situated, or within 100 feet of a public street or road or highway dedicated prior to the commencement of drilling of the well, or within 150 feet of either a well being drilled or a well theretofore drilled which is producing oil or gas or a well which has been drilled and is not producing but which is capable of producing oil or gas, is a public nuisance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3601.

Where several contiguous parcels of land in one or different ownerships are operated as a single oil or gas lease or operating unit, the term “outer boundary line” means the outer boundary line of the lands included in the lease or unit. In determining the contiguity of any such parcels of land, no street, road or alley lying within the lease or unit shall be deemed to interrupt such contiguity.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.

Where a parcel of land contains one acre or more, but is less than 250 feet in width, there may be drilled on the parcel of land not more than one well to each acre of the area if the surface location of any well or wells is so placed as to be as far from the lateral boundary lines of the parcel of land as the configuration of the surface and the existing improvements thereon will permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1218.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.1.

Where a parcel of land contains one acre or more and the hydrocarbons to be developed are too heavy or viscous to produce by normal means, and the supervisor so determines, the supervisor may approve proposals to drill wells at whatever locations he deems advisable for the purpose of the proper development of such hydrocarbons by the application of pressure, heat or other means for the reduction of oil viscosity, and such wells shall not be classed as public nuisances after approval by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1218.)
-------------------------------------------

3602.2.

In determining the area of parcels of land for the purposes of this chapter, the area of the oil and gas mineral estate shall be used exclusively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

3603.

For the purposes of this chapter, an alley which intersects or lies within any block or other subdivision unit is not a public street or road.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3604.

Each day in which the drilling of any well is carried on, or on which it is permitted to produce oil or gas in violation of this chapter is a separate nuisance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3605.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any field producing oil or gas on August 14, 1931.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3606.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, where a parcel of land contains one acre or more and where all or substantially all of the surface of such parcel of land is unavailable for the surface location of oil or gas wells, there may be drilled or produced not more than one well into each acre of such parcel of land, and the surface location of such well may be located upon property which may or may not contain one acre or more of surface area, and the property upon the surface of which the surface location of such well may be located may or may not be contiguous to such parcel of land; provided:

1. No operator shall construct or maintain any derrick within 150 feet of any other derrick, then standing, of such operator unless approved in advance by the supervisor who may, in granting such approval, attach such conditions as are reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

2. The surface location of such well, as measured from the center of the hole, shall be not less than 25 feet from an outer boundary of the surface of the property upon which such well is located, and shall be not less than 25 feet from any dedicated public street, road or highway which is so dedicated and in such public use at the time of the commencement of drilling of such well.

3. The producing interval of such well shall be not less than 75 feet from an outer boundary of the parcel of land into which such producing interval is drilled, and the producing interval of such well shall be not less than 150 feet, as measured horizontally in the same zone, from the producing interval of any other well which is producing or capable of producing oil or gas. If the parcel of land qualified to be drilled under this section is less than 150 feet in width, the producing interval of such well shall be as far from the lateral boundary lines of the property as is practicable.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the supervisor may require, at the time supervisor gives approval of notice of intention to drill, redrill or deepen, that a subsurface directional survey be made for such well, and that a plat of said directional survey be filed with the supervisor within fifteen (15) days of completion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

3606.1.

The 150-foot restriction in Sections 3600 and elsewhere in this chapter shall apply only to wells drilled and producing from the same zone or pool; provided, however, that the well density shall not exceed one well per acre unless the supervisor shall determine that more than one zone or pool underlies the property and that it is not practical to produce from all of such zones or pools from a single well per acre and that such other zones or pools are being drained by offset wells. In such cases only, a maximum density of two wells per acre may be approved. These exceptions to the general spacing rule shall apply also to properties qualifying under Sections 3602 and 3606.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 925.)
-------------------------------------------

3607.

The prohibition set forth in Section 3600 against drilling within 100 feet of any public street or highway shall not apply in the case of any street or highway which is opened through a field in which drilling was commenced prior to the opening of the street or highway.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1559.)
-------------------------------------------

3608.

Where land aggregating less than one acre is surrounded by other lands, which other lands are subject to an oil and gas lease aggregating one acre or more, and if, under the provisions of Sections 3600 to 3607, inclusive, of the Public Resources Code, the drilling or producing of a well on said land is declared to be a public nuisance, said land shall, for oil and gas development purposes and to prevent waste and to protect the oil and gas rights of landowners, be deemed included in said oil and gas lease on said other lands, and shall be subject to all the terms and provisions thereof, when the State Oil and Gas Supervisor has caused to be recorded with the county recorder of the county in which said land aggregating less than one acre is located a declaration as hereinafter provided. A request for inclusion of surrounded land aggregating less than one acre may be filed with the supervisor at any time by either the lessee of such other lands or by the owner or lessee of such surrounded land or the supervisor may act upon his own motion. Before filing such request the lessee of such other lands shall make a reasonable effort to include each parcel of surrounded land, within the oil and gas lease upon such other lands.

There shall be attached to such request a statement which shall set forth the name or names of the record owner or record owners of said land aggregating less than one acre which is to be included in said oil and gas lease on said other lands, the legal description of said land aggregating less than one acre, name of the lessee of the oil and gas lease in which such land is to be included, and a reference to the book and page of the official records of the county recorder where such oil and gas lease is recorded or a reference to the document number and date of recordation of such oil and gas lease. Within 20 days following receipt of such request and attached statement, the supervisor shall cause to be recorded with the county recorder of the county in which said land aggregating less than one acre is located, a declaration, signed by him or his assistant or deputy, that said land is deemed by the provisions of this section to be included in said oil and gas lease on said other lands. Such declaration shall set forth the same information required to be set forth in the statement attached to the request, and a copy thereof shall be mailed or otherwise delivered by the supervisor to the lessee. The county recorder shall accept such declaration for recordation and shall index such declaration in the names of all persons or corporations mentioned therein. From the time of recording thereof in the office of the county recorder such notice shall impart constructive notice of the contents thereof to all persons dealing with the land therein described.

The owners of the oil and gas mineral rights in said land so deemed included in said oil and gas lease on said other lands, as herein provided, shall thereafter receive in money, based upon the production of oil and gas from the leasehold including said land or lands unitized or pooled therewith, a pro rata share of the landowners’ royalty determined in accordance with the provisions of said oil and gas lease in the proportion that the area of said land bears to the aggregate of the total area covered by said oil and gas lease including the area of said land or as otherwise provided in said lease; provided further, that said owners of said oil and gas mineral rights in said land shall in no case receive less than their pro rata share determined, as herein provided, of the value of one-eighth part of the oil and gas produced, saved and sold from or allocated to the operating unit comprising said leasehold on said other lands and said land, computed in accordance with the provisions of said oil and gas lease with respect to the computation of landowners’ royalty; provided further that upon recordation of the statement by the supervisor, the owners of such oil and gas mineral rights in such land shall also receive a pro rata share of any other benefits thereafter accruing to the owners of the oil and gas mineral rights under the terms of the oil and gas lease on such other lands; and provided further, that without the consent of said owners of said land the lessee or operator of said oil and gas leasehold shall have no right to use the surface of said land nor to use the subsurface thereof down to a depth of 200 feet below the surface thereof.

Where said land aggregating less than one acre is surrounded by lands which are not subject to a single oil and gas lease but is surrounded by lands which are subject to two or more separate oil and gas leases, one or more of which oil or gas leases aggregates one acre or more, then in such event the said land aggregating less than one acre shall, as herein provided, be included within and be joined to that oil and gas lease aggregating one acre or more as to which said parcel of land aggregating less than one acre has the longest common boundary. If there is no longest common boundary, the request shall designate the lease, aggregating one acre or more, into which the parcel aggregating less than one acre shall be included by the declaration of the supervisor; otherwise the supervisor shall make such designation.

In determining the contiguity of any parcels of land for the purposes hereof, no road, street or alley shall be deemed to interrupt such contiguity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2074.)
-------------------------------------------

3608.1.

The owner or operator of any leasehold, into which land has been included under the provisions of Section 3608, shall cause to be recorded an appropriate quitclaim to such land in the proper county recorder’s office when such leasehold has been terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 405.)
-------------------------------------------

3609.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the supervisor determines, pursuant to rules and regulations and after a public hearing, that the development of a pool discovered after the effective date of this section for the production of oil and gas, or either, requires the adoption of a well-spacing pattern other than that specified in Sections 3600 to 3608.1, inclusive, in order to prevent waste and to increase the ultimate economic recovery of oil or gas, he may adopt a well-spacing plan to apply to the surface and subsurface of a designated pool. Such plan shall be applicable to all wells thereafter drilled or redrilled into such pool. Such plan may include a requirement that, as a prerequisite to approval to drill or redrill a well, all or certain specified parcels of land shall be included in a pooling or unit agreement. The supervisor may provide in the rules and regulations for mandatory pooling agreements in connection with the well-spacing order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 864.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Unit Operation [3630. - 3690.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration of Policy [3630. - 3631.]

3630.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the management, development, and operation of lands as a unit for the production of oil and gas aids in preventing waste, increases the ultimate recovery of oil and gas, and facilitates increased concurrent use of surface lands for other beneficial purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3631.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in such a manner as to conflict with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 6826) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [3635. - 3637.3.]

3635.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.1.

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, or other representative of any kind and includes the state and any city, county, city and county, district or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or of any governmental subdivision whatsoever.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.2.

“Land” means both surface and mineral rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.3.

“Pool” means an underground reservoir containing, or appearing at the time of determination to contain, a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas or both. Each zone of a general structure which is separated from any other zone in the structure is a separate pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.4.

“Field” means the same general surface area which is underlaid or reasonably appears to be underlaid by one or more pools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3635.5.

“Tracts of land” means land areas under separate ownership which are all of the following:

(a) Contiguous either on the surface or in the subsurface.

(b) Located within a field which has been producing for more than 20 years.

(c) Located within a field over 75 percent of which lies within incorporated areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3636.

“Unit agreement” means and includes, in addition to the unit agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 3640) of this chapter, any consent agreement or other agreement entered into in connection with, and supplemental to, such unit agreement, but does not include a unit operating agreement or any preliminary agreement confined to effectuating any exchange of interests in land which the parties to such preliminary agreement may desire. “Unit operating agreement” means an agreement, entered into by the working interest owners only, governing all operations performed by the unit operator pursuant to the unit agreement and the unit operating agreement for the production of unitized substances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3636.1.

“Unit area” means all lands included within an area subject to a unit agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 3640) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3636.2.

“Unit production” means all oil, gas, and other hydrocarbon substances produced from a unit area from the effective date of a unit agreement approved by the supervisor pursuant to Section 3643.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3636.3.

“Unit operator” means the person or persons designated by the working interest owners as operator or operators of the unit area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3637.

“Working interest” means an interest held in lands by virtue of fee title, including lands held in trust, a lease, operating agreement, or otherwise, under which the owner of such interest has the right to drill for, develop, and produce oil and gas. A working interest shall be deemed vested in the owner thereof even though his right to drill or produce may be delegated to an operator under a drilling and operating agreement, unit agreement, or other type of operating agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3637.1.

“Working interest owner” means a person owning a working interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3637.2.

“Royalty interest” means a right to or interest in oil and gas produced from any lands or in the proceeds of the first sale thereof other than a working interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3637.3.

“Royalty interest owner” means a person owning a royalty interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Unit Agreements [3640. - 3659.]

3640.

Tracts of land may be unitized as provided in this article to provide for the management, development, and operation thereof as a unit to prevent, or to assist in preventing, waste and to increase the ultimate recovery of oil and gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3641.

An agreement for the management, development, and operation of two or more tracts of land in the same field or in the same producing or prospective pool as a unit without regard to separate ownerships, and for the allocation of benefits and costs on a basis set forth in such agreement, shall be valid and binding upon those who consent thereto and may be filed with the supervisor for approval. However, unless and until the agreement qualifies for approval, and is approved, by the supervisor persons who do not consent thereto shall not be bound thereby, nor shall their rights be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3642.

Any proposed agreement for unit operation of tracts of land which has been consented to by persons who own title to working interests which aggregate at least an undivided three-fourths of the total working interests in the area proposed to be unitized, and by persons who own title to the royalty interest which aggregates at least an undivided three-fourths of the total royalty interest in the area proposed to be unitized, may be filed with the supervisor by the owner of any such working interest in conjunction with a petition requesting approval thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3643.

The unit agreement shall be approved, if, after a public hearing, the supervisor finds all of the following:

(a) The unit area of the proposed agreement for unit operation takes in all tracts which, consistent with good oilfield practice, should be considered a part of and related to the field or pool or pools, or portions thereof, proposed for unit operation but does not include tracts which, consistent with good oilfield practice, should not be considered a part of or related to the field or pool or pools, or portions thereof, proposed for unit operation.

(b) As of the date of filing of the petition, the proposed unit agreement was consented to by persons owning at least three-fourths of the working interests and three-fourths of the lessors’ royalty interests as described in Section 3642.

(c) The unitized management and operation of the pool or pools, or portions thereof, proposed to be unitized is reasonably necessary in order to carry on pressure maintenance or pressure replenishment operations, cycling or recycling operations, gas injection operations, water flooding operations, reduction of oil viscosity operations, or any combination thereof, or any other form of joint effort calculated to increase the ultimate recovery of oil and gas from the proposed unit area.

(d) The value of the estimated recovery of additional oil or gas, or the increased present worth value due to accelerated recovery of oil or gas, as a result of the unit operations will exceed the estimated additional cost incident to conducting such operations.

(e) The proposed unit agreement provides for an allocation of the unit production among and to the separately owned tracts in the area proposed to be unitized such as will reasonably permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such separately owned tracts to produce or receive, in lieu thereof, their fair, equitable, and reasonable pro rata share of the unit production or other benefits thereof.

(f) The proposed unit agreement provides, to the full extent practical, for the organization and consolidation of surface facilities, including oil production, storage, treatment, and transportation facilities, in such a manner as will eliminate wasteful and excessive use of land surface areas, freeing such areas for other productive use and development, and provides a fair procedure for the waiver, from time to time, of the working interest owners’ right of entry on surface areas which in the future become unneeded for the conduct of unit operations.

(g) The proposed unit agreement is fair and reasonable under all the circumstances in other material respects.

(h) If state-owned lands under the jurisdiction of the State Lands Commission are included in the proposed unit agreement, such agreement has been reviewed and approved by the commission as to such lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3644.

A tract of land’s fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production shall be measured by the value of such tract for oil and gas purposes and its contributing value to the unit in relation to like values of other tracts in the unit area, taking into account, among other things, the following:

(a) The primary tract value based upon the projected future value of hydrocarbon substances that would be produced by primary means from such tract after the date of unitization, if no secondary recovery operation were undertaken.

(b) The secondary tract value based upon consideration of the following factors:

(1) The volume in acre-feet of porous, permeable sand originally saturated with hydrocarbon substances within a zone to be unitized, and underlying such tract.

(2) The hydrocarbon substances per acre-foot of such zone recoverable by means of secondary recovery operations.

(3) The value of the hydrocarbon substances so recoverable from such tract from such zones to be unitized.

(4) In the event the necessary data is not available as listed in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the value may be assigned using a prudent engineering method, depending on the data available.

(c) All other factors which significantly bear upon the value of the committed properties for primary and secondary recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3645.

Upon giving his approval to the unit agreement pursuant to Section 3643, the supervisor shall issue an order directing unit operations of the unit area in accordance with the unit agreement, directing the recordation of such agreement in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any part of the unit area is situated, and requiring that the interests of all persons in the unit area be thereafter subject to the unit agreement the same as if all such persons had expressly consented to the unit agreement. An order of the supervisor issued pursuant to this section shall become effective on the date provided for in the order, except that no such order shall become effective until all interests in the unit area for which timely offers of sale have been made pursuant to Section 3647 have been purchased as provided in that section, or until the termination of such offers of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1129.)
-------------------------------------------

3646.

The supervisor’s order shall include fair and reasonable provisions for all of the following:

(a) The date when all tracts of land not theretofore committed to the unit shall be subject to unit operation, which date shall not be earlier than the first day of the month following the effective date of the supervisor’s order.

(b) Provision for the carrying or otherwise financing of any persons who request the same and who the supervisor determines are unable to meet their financial obligations in connection with the unit operation, allowing a reasonable interest charge to those who carry or finance such obligations.

(c) Such additional provisions which the supervisor determines to be appropriate for bringing into the unit area on a fair and reasonable basis tracts of land and interests not theretofore committed to the unit agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3647.

The owner of any working interest or royalty interest in a tract which is the subject of a unit agreement who did not consent to the proposed unit agreement shall, 60 days following the date upon which the supervisor issues his order under the provisions of Section 3645, be entitled to offer his interest for sale pursuant to this section. All working interest owners who consented to the proposed unit agreement shall be entitled to participate in purchasing such interest in proportion to their respective shares of unit production. Unless one or more working interest owners purchase such interest, the order of the supervisor shall not become effective.

If a disagreement arises with respect to the price at which such an interest shall be purchased, then either party may request the supervisor to authorize the creation of an arbitration committee consisting of three members, one member appointed by the seller, one member appointed by the purchaser or purchasers and a third member selected by the other two members, to make an independent appraisal of the value of the interest as of the date the supervisor issued his order under Section 3645. Such committee shall consider all relevant data and information submitted by interested parties and may seek and consider such other information as it deems relevant. The arbitration committee shall determine the fair market value of the interest as of the date the supervisor issued his order under Section 3645 and fix the price at which the sale shall be consummated, and its determination shall be binding on the parties; except that, within 30 days after the determination of the arbitration committee has been mailed to the parties concerned, the seller or the purchaser or any one or more of the purchasers may have such price judicially determined by filing suit for a declaratory judgment as to the fair market value in the superior court for the county in which the tract involved, or the greater portion of it, lies. The compensation and expenses of the arbitration committee shall be subject to approval in amount by the supervisor and, if the unit becomes effective, shall be paid by the working interest owners who elected to participate in purchasing such interest in the proportion they share unit expenses. If the unit does not become effective within the time provided for in the order of the supervisor issued under Section 3645, the working interest owners who have consented to the unit agreement and have requested the independent appraisal shall pay such compensation and expenses in proportion to what would have been their share of unit expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3648.

Any unit agreement approved by the supervisor shall contain a provision under which a party whose surface land is being utilized for the benefit of the unit area shall be entitled to compensation for the reasonable value of the use of such surface.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3649.

Any proposed modification of an approved unit agreement shall be submitted by the unit operator to the supervisor for his review and approval. No modification shall alter or change the basis for allocating production to tracts of land theretofore committed to the unit area without the express written consent of all persons who might be adversely affected thereby. The supervisor shall approve the proposed modification if, after a public hearing, he finds that the proposed unit agreement modification is consented to by persons who own title to working interests which aggregate at least an undivided three-fourths of the total working interests within the unit area and by persons who own title to the royalty interest which aggregate at least an undivided three-fourths of the total royalty interest in the unit area, that the proposed modification is in conformity with other provisions of the unit agreement, that it is consistent with the purpose of this chapter, and is fair and reasonable under all the circumstances. Upon approval, the unit agreement modification shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any part of the unit area is situated and thereafter shall be binding upon all persons having any interest in the pool or pools, or portions thereof, subject to the unit agreement the same as if all such persons had expressly agreed to the modification.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as applying to any modification of a unit operating agreement entered into exclusively by the working interest owners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3650.

If at any time after the entry of an order of unitization issued pursuant to Section 3645, it develops that all or a portion of a further tract or tracts of land should be included within the unit area, persons who own any working interest in the pool or pools, or portions thereof, may file a petition with the supervisor requesting the addition of such tract or tracts of land to the unit area, insofar as they contain the pool or pools, or portions thereof. Upon the filing of such a petition, the supervisor shall hold a public hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3651.

The supervisor shall issue his order that such further tract or tracts of land insofar as they contain the pool or pools, or portions thereof, and the interests of all persons therein, upon recordation of such order in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any part of the original unit area or such additional tracts are situated, shall thereafter be subject to unit operations if he finds all of the following:

(a) All or a portion of such further tract or tracts of land do contain the pool or pools, or portions thereof, previously ordered unitized by the supervisor.

(b) The unit agreement has been consented to by persons who own title to working interests which aggregate at least an undivided three-fourths of the working interests in the total area proposed to be unitized, and by persons who own title to the royalty interest which aggregates at least an undivided three-fourths of the royalty interest in the total area proposed to be unitized.

(c) The addition of such further tract or tracts of land insofar as they contain the pool or pools to the unit operations is reasonably necessary in order to prevent waste or to increase the ultimate recovery of oil and gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3652.

The supervisor’s order issued pursuant to Section 3651 shall contain a fair basis for allocating production to such further tract or tracts of land and make fair and reasonable provisions under the circumstances in other respects for bringing into the unit operation such tract or tracts of land. In providing for the allocation of unit production from the enlarged unit area, the order shall, however, first treat the unit area previously established as a single tract, and the portion of unit production so allocated thereto shall then be allocated among the separately owned tracts of land included in such previously established unit area in the same proportion as specified therefor in the previous order. The supervisor shall allocate production from the enlarged unit area between the previously established unit area and the additional tract or tracts of land, and if there be more than one such additional tract of land, shall allocate the production allotted the additional tracts of land as between such additional tracts of land, in such a manner as will reasonably permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such tracts of land to produce or receive, in lieu thereof, their fair, equitable, and reasonable pro rata share of the unit production or other benefits thereof. A tract’s fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production shall be measured by the value of each such tract of land for oil and gas purposes and its contributing value to the unit operation in relation to like values of other tracts in the unit, taking into account, among other things, the following:

(a) The primary tract value based upon the projected future value of hydrocarbon substances that would be produced by primary means from such tract after the date of unitization, if no secondary recovery operation were undertaken.

(b) The secondary tract value based upon consideration of the following factors:

(1) The volume in acre-feet of porous, permeable sand originally saturated with hydrocarbon substances within a zone to be unitized, and underlying such tract.

(2) The hydrocarbon substances per acre-foot of such zone recoverable by means of secondary recovery operations.

(3) The value of the hydrocarbon substances so recoverable from such tract from such zones to be unitized.

(4) In the event the necessary data is not available as listed in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the value may be assigned using a prudent engineering method, depending on the data available.

(c) All other factors which significantly bear upon the value of the committed properties for primary and secondary recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3653.

Any disagreement with respect to the unit operation between persons owning any interest in the pool or pools, or portions thereof, subject to the unit agreement may be submitted to the supervisor for his review and decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3653.5.

A petition requesting approval of a unit agreement and each copy thereof shall contain or have attached to it:

(a) A request that the supervisor approve the unit agreement.

(b) A copy of the unit agreement.

(c) A report with appropriate engineering, reservoir, and geologic data and maps outlining in detail how the unit agreement qualifies for approval pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Evidence that the required number of working interest owners and royalty interest owners have consented to the unit agreement. Generally, such evidence shall consist of a certificate of the petitioner or unit operator that the requisite number of working interest owners and royalty interest owners have consented to the unit agreement; provided, however, that if the accuracy of the certificate is challenged by any person, additional evidence will be required. Additional evidence may be supplied by the petitioner or requested by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

3654.

Any and all decisions or determinations made by the supervisor under the provisions of this chapter shall be appealable to any court of competent jurisdiction by any person whose interests are affected by any such decision or determination. Except as otherwise provided in this article, such appeal must be made within 60 days from the date of such decision or determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3655.
